Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB445.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1323(d) of Title 25 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 1323. Application with driver's license application.* * *(d) Prohibition and subsequent notice.--(1) An individual who is not a qualified elector is ineligible to register to vote under this section.(2) The department shall keep a record of individuals ineligible to register under paragraph (1) due to failure to meet the age requirement under section 1301(a) (relating to qualifications to register). The department shall provide notice of the eligibility to vote and voter registration materials to those individuals at the time an individual 123456789101112131415161718 reaches 18 years of age.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0445PN0374 - 2 - 123